Tennessee, session 114, HB0371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-302, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
( )
(1) In addition to any other sentence authorized by this section, a person
convicted of a Class A or Class B misdemeanor in general sessions court shall
be required to complete a cognitive behavioral training course.
(2) The offender must pay the cost of the course.
(3) The offender must provide proof of course completion to the court or
the court's designee within the time period specified by the court. An offender
who willfully fails to complete the course or to provide proof of completion within
the specified time period is in contempt of court and may be punished by
confinement of up to ten (10) days.
(4) A cognitive behavioral training course used to fulfill the requirement in
this subsection ( ) must:
(A) Be available to be completed online via computer or mobile
device;
(B) Be available in languages other than English;
(C) Cost the offender no more than one hundred dollars ($100)
and offer payment options; and
HB0371
001798
- 1 -

(D) Include required human interaction in the completion of the
course, including, but not limited to, grading, feedback, or guidance.
(5) An entity providing a cognitive behavioral training course online must:
(A) Be a current provider of online cognitive behavioral services
to a federal, state, or local entity, with documented or published results of
effectiveness;
(B) Be available to provide telephone support for offenders at
least five (5) days per week;
(C) Provide human facilitators responsible for grading course
materials;
(D) Provide the offender with a certificate of completion within
seventy-two (72) hours of finishing the course; and
(E) Provide all necessary informational or referral materials to
counties at no cost to the county.
(6) A county or municipality may provide an in-person cognitive
behavioral training program; provided, however, that if such a program is offered,
the county or municipality must also offer an online cognitive behavioral training
program that complies with the requirements of subdivisions ( )(4)–(5).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect on July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001798